Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,133
Bank; business of leasing personal property; subject to rules and regulations.

Any bank may engage, directly or indirectly, in the business of leasing personal property subject to rules and regulations as may be adopted and promulgated by the director.

Laws 1977, LB 506, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 123.